District of Columbia statutes.
38-1806.09

Termination of federal support; sense of the Congress relating to continuation of activities.

(a)

Termination of federal support. —

The authority under this subchapter to provide assistance to the private, nonprofit corporation or any other entity established pursuant to this subchapter shall terminate on October 1, 1999.

(b)

Sense of the Congress relating to continuation of activities. —

It is the sense of the Congress that:

(1)

The activities of the private, nonprofit corporation under § 38-1806.04 should continue to be carried out after October 1, 1999, with resources made available from the private sector; and

(2)

The corporation should provide oversight and coordination for such activities after such date.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [269], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2609
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.69.